Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4942.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. If the executive branch of the federal government suspends or purports to suspend the privilege of the writ of habeas corpus under clause 2 of section 9 of article I of the Constitution of the United States, this state or a local unit of government of this state shall not appropriate, disburse, or otherwise expend state or local funds for a purpose that violates section 12 of article I of the state constitution of 1963.